North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120C. Lobbying.
Article 3. Prohibitions and Restrictions.

§ 120C-300.
Contingency fees prohibited.

No individual shall act as a lobbyist and receive payment for lobbying that is dependent upon the result or outcome of any legislative or executive action.

This section shall not apply to an individual doing business with the State who is engaged in sales with respect to that business with the State whose regular remuneration agreement includes commissions based on those sales. For purposes of this subsection, the term “regular remuneration” means any money, thing of value, or economic benefit conferred on or received by the individual in return for services rendered or to be rendered by that individual or another.

Any payment to a lobbyist in violation of this section is subject to forfeiture and shall be paid into the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund.

History.

1933, c. 11, s. 3; 1975, c. 820, s. 1; 1991, c. 740, s. 1.1; 2005-456, s. 1; 2006-201, s. 18; 2008-213, s. 16; 2010-169, s. 17(f); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 120C-301.
Election influence prohibited.

No person shall attempt to influence the action of any designated individual by the promise of financial support of the designated individual’s candidacy, or by threat of financial support in opposition to the designated individual’s candidacy in any future election.

No lobbyist, lobbyist principal, or other person required to register under this Chapter shall attempt to influence the action of any designated individual by the promise of financial support of the designated individual’s candidacy, or by threat of financial support in opposition to the designated individual’s candidacy in any future election.

History.

1933, c. 11, s. 3; 1975, c. 820, s. 1; 1991, c. 740, s. 1.1; 2005-456, s. 1; 2006-201, s. 18; 2008-213, s. 90; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 120C-302.

Recodified as

G.S. 163-278.13

C, by Session Laws 2007-347, s. 5(a), effective August 9, 2007.

§ 120C-303.
Gifts by lobbyists and lobbyist principals prohibited.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no lobbyist or lobbyist principal may do any of the following:

Knowingly give a gift to a designated individual.

Knowingly give a gift with the intent that a designated individual be an ultimate recipient.

Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to gifts as described in G.S. 138A-32(f).

The offering or giving of a gift in compliance with this Chapter without corrupt intent shall not constitute a violation of the statutes related to bribery under

G.S. 14-217

, 14-218, or 120-86, but shall be subject to civil fines under G.S. 120C-602(b).

Gifts made to a nonpartisan state, regional, national, or international legislative organization of which the General Assembly is a member or a legislator or legislative employee is a member or participant of by virtue of that legislator’s or legislative employee’s public position, or to an affiliated organization of that nonpartisan state, regional, national, or international organization, shall not constitute a violation of subdivision (a)(2) of this section or of G.S. 138A-32(c).

Gifts made to a nonpartisan state, regional, national, or international organization of which a public servant’s agency is a member or a public servant is a member or participant of by virtue of that public servant’s public position, or to an affiliated organization of that nonpartisan state, regional, national, or international organization, shall not constitute a violation of subdivision (a)(2) of this section or of G.S. 138A-32(c).

History.

2006-201, s. 18; 2007-348, s. 12(a), (b); 2008-213, ss. 17-19, 90; 2010-169, s. 15(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 120C-304.
Restrictions.

No legislator or former legislator may register as a lobbyist under this Article:

While in office.

Before the later of the close of session as set forth in G.S. 120C-100(a)(7)b.1 in which the legislator served or six months after leaving office.

No public servant or former public servant as defined in G.S. 138A-3(70)a. may register as a lobbyist under this Chapter while in office or within six months after leaving office.

No public servant or former public servant as defined in G.S. 138A-3(70)c. may register as a lobbyist under this Chapter within six months after separation from employment as a public servant. No other employee of any State agency may register as a lobbyist under this Chapter to lobby the State agency that previously employed the former employee within six months after voluntary separation or separation for cause from that State agency.

No individual registered as a lobbyist under this Article shall serve as a treasurer as defined in G.S. 163-278.6(95) or an assistant campaign treasurer for a political committee for the election of a member of the General Assembly or a Constitutional officer of the State.

A lobbyist shall not be eligible for appointment by a State official to, or service on, any body created under the laws of this State that has regulatory authority over the activities of a person or governmental unit that the lobbyist currently represents or has represented within 120 days after the expiration of the lobbyist’s registration representing that person or governmental unit. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit appointment by any unit of local government.

Any appointment or registration made in violation of this section shall be void.

History.

2005-456, s. 1; 2006-201, s. 18; 2007-348, s. 13(a); 2008-213, ss. 20, 21; 2010-169, s. 4(a), (b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 120C-305.
Prohibition on the use of cash or credit of the lobbyist.

No lobbyist or another acting on the lobbyist’s behalf shall lobby by permitting a designated individual, or that designated individual’s immediate family member, to use the cash or credit of the lobbyist unless the lobbyist is in attendance at the time of the reportable expenditure.

G.S. 120C-303

applies to this section.

History.

2006-201, s. 18; 2008-213, s. 22; 2010-169, s. 17(g); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§§ 120C-306 through 120C-399.

Reserved for future codification purposes.